Connecticut, session 2026, HB05347.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section, (1)
2 "individual with limited-English proficiency" means an individual
3 whose primary and preferred language is not English, and who has a
4 limited ability to read, speak, write or understand English, (2) "vital
5 records" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-36 of the general
6 statutes, and (3) "identification document" means a document that can
7 be used to verify the holder's identity, including, but not limited to, a
8 driver's license.
9 (b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of
10 Administrative Services shall develop a plan for the review and
11 translation of all printed or electronic forms or applications required to
sHB5347 / File No. 195 1

sHB5347 File No. 195
12 access services or benefits provided by executive branch state agencies,
13 including, but not limited to, forms or applications necessary to access
14 vital records or to obtain identification documents, into the twelve most
15 common non-English languages spoken by individuals with limited-
16 English proficiency in the state based on the data in the most recent
17 American Community Survey published by the United States Census
18 Bureau. Thereafter, the commissioner shall update such plan as
19 necessary, but not less than every two years.
20 (c) Not later than February 1, 2027, each state agency in the executive
21 branch shall (1) adopt and implement the plan developed under
22 subsection (b) of this section and update such plan every two years
23 thereafter, and (2) designate a language access coordinator to work with
24 the Department of Administrative Services to ensure compliance with
25 such plan.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(a)(2), "vital record" was changed to "vital records", for
consistency.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5347 / File No. 195 2

sHB5347 File No. 195
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various State Agencies App Fund - Cost 5,000,000 None
Department of Administrative GF - Cost 780,000 530,000
Services
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Cost 96,186 96,186
Benefits1
Note: GF=General Fund; App Fund=All Appropriated Funds
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill creates various requirements relating to the development and
adoption of a plan to translate all printed or electronic forms or
applications required to access executive branch state agency services or
benefits into the twelve most common languages spoken in the state
besides English. The requirements include (1) the development of a plan
by the Department of Administrative Services (DAS) by January 1, 2027,
(2) the adoption of the plan by each executive agency by February 1,
2027, and (3) the designation of a language access coordinator to work
with DAS to ensure compliance with the plan.
Developing the plan results in a one-time cost to DAS of $250,000 in
FY 27 to hire a consultant with the necessary expertise to develop the
plan. Requiring each executive branch agency to translate and
reproduce each of the approximately 1,500 applications result in
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
sHB5347 / File No. 195 3

sHB5347 File No. 195
onetime costs of up to $5 million to various agencies in FY 27. These
costs are primarily attributed to technological updates to administrative
systems and producing the non-web-based versions of these
applications and forms. The requirement to ensure compliance with the
plan requires two new employees within DAS with a total cost of
$326,186 ($230,000 in salary and $96,186 for fringe) and an additional
cost of $300,000 per year in consultant fees.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation. In addition, the bill requires
the plan to be updated as necessary which results in potential future
one-time costs to accommodate changes to applications and forms.
sHB5347 / File No. 195 4

sHB5347 File No. 195
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5347
AN ACT REQUIRING A PLAN FOR THE TRANSLATION AND
REVIEW OF FORMS AND APPLICATIONS REQUIRED TO ACCESS
STATE AGENCY SERVICES OR BENEFITS BY LIMITED-ENGLISH
PROFICIENT INDIVIDUALS.